trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="NP_IZE_IZB_mi">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP00000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP0000D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP0000A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NP0000X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPCS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPFS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NPMS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][IZB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="RG_ADJ_IZL">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>RG</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADJ][IZL]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADJ][IZL]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>beira-zuntzezko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_fibra_de_vidrio<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>asmo_oneko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>bien_intencionado<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>konfiantzazko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_confianza<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jaurtigairik_gabeko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_fogueo<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>fama_txarreko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_mala_nota<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>markako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_marca<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gala_erdiko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_media_gala<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sekulako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_película<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lehorreko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_secano<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>behar-beharrezko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>estrictamente_necesario<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>premiazko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>absolutamente_necesario<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>xede_horretarako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>a_el_efecto<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aire_zabaleko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>a_cielo_descubierto<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>arrisku_orotarako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>a_todo_riesgo<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aldiko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>cada_vez<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>behin-betiko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>con_carácter_definitivo<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>asto_arrak_umea_egin_orduko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>cuando_la_rana_críe_pelo<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>garrantzi_handiagoko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_mayor_cuantía<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kontuz_ibiltzeko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_abrigo<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sekulako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_aquí_te_espero<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gustu_oneko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_buen_tono<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kalitate_oneko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_calidad<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>adineko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_edad<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ohiz_kanpoko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_excepción<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>txikitako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_la_infancia<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gustu_txarreko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_mal_tono<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inolako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_ningún_tipo<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hitzeko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_palabra<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>garrantzi_gutxiko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_pitiminí<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>probetxuzko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_pro<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ordezko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_repuesto<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>betiko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_siempre<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>bularreko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_teta<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eguneko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>de_el_día<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>landu_gabeko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>en_bruto<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>jarduneko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>en_ejercicio<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>berekiko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>entre_sí<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sekulako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>lo_nunca_visto<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>geroko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>para_después<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>pertsonako<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>por_cabeza<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elkarrentzako_moduko<s n="adj"/></l> 
        <r>tal_para_cual<s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="RG_ADJ_IZL"/> 
    </e>
